Illinois, session 104th, SB2253.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 6Section 2705-405 and by adding Section 2705-407 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-405)  (was 20 ILCS 2705/49.25b)8    Sec. 2705-405. Preparation of State Rail Plan. In 9preparation of the State Rail Plan under Section 2705-400, the 10Department shall consult with recognized railroad labor 11organizations, the Department of Commerce and Economic 12Opportunity, railroad management, all Class 1 and short line 13railroads, relevant businesses engaged in the railroad 14industry, affected units of local government, affected State 15agencies, and affected shipping interests.16(Source: P.A. 94-793, eff. 5-19-06.) 17    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-407 new)18    Sec. 2705-407. Freight Rail Transportation Coordination 19Committee. The Department shall create a Freight Rail 20Coordination Committee to address highway projects that 21require coordination with Class 1 railroads. The Secretary 22shall appoint:  SB2253 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1        (1) One representative from each regional division 2    within the Department.3        (2) One representative from the Department with 4    expertise in land acquisition.5        (3) One representative from the Department with 6    expertise in legal matters.7        (4) One representative from the Department with 8    expertise in design.9        (5) Any other representatives from the Department as 10    necessary.11        (6) One representative from each Class 1 railroad in 12    the State in consultation with the Class 1 railroad.13        (7) One representative from a statewide association 14    representing Class 1 railroads.15    The Committee shall meet quarterly to discuss highway 16projects and work toward agreement on land rights issues, 17standardized construction, and maintenance agreements for all 18Class 1 railroads, standardizing procedures across the 19Department, and standardizing land acquisition processes 20within the Class 1 railroads.21    This Section is repealed January 1, 2031. 22    Section 10. The Public Officer Prohibited Activities Act 23is amended by changing Section 3.1 as follows: 24    (50 ILCS 105/3.1)  (from Ch. 102, par. 3.1)  SB2253 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1    Sec. 3.1. Before any contract relating to the ownership or 2use of real property is entered into by and between the State 3or any local governmental unit or any agency of either the 4identity of every owner and beneficiary having any interest, 5real or personal, in such property, and every member, 6shareholder, limited partner, or general partner entitled to 7receive more than 7 1/2% of the total distributable income of 8any limited liability company, corporation, or limited 9partnership having any interest, real or personal, in such 10property must be disclosed. The disclosure shall be in writing 11and shall be subscribed by a member, owner, authorized 12trustee, corporate official, general partner, or managing 13agent, or his or her authorized attorney or other authorized 14representative with knowledge of the information required by 15the disclosure, under oath. However, if the interest, stock, 16or shares in a limited liability company, corporation, or 17general partnership is publicly traded and there is no readily 18known individual having greater than a 7 1/2% interest, then a 19statement to that effect, subscribed to under oath by a 20member, officer of the corporation, general partner, or 21managing agent, or his or her authorized attorney, shall 22fulfill the disclosure statement requirement of this Section. 23The disclosure requirement of this Section may also be 24satisfied by providing a copy of the most recent proxy 25statement or other official corporate document filed in 26the_previous calendar year with the federal Securities and   SB2253 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1Exchange Commission or similar federal regulatory body 2disclosing the overall ownership of the limited liability 3company, corporation or general partnership. As a condition of 4contracts entered into on or after the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of 1995, the beneficiaries of a lease shall 6furnish the trustee of a trust subject to disclosure under 7this Section with a binding non-revocable letter of direction 8authorizing the trustee to provide the State with an 9up-to-date disclosure whenever requested by the State. The 10letter of direction shall be binding on beneficiaries' heirs, 11successors, and assigns during the term of the contract. This 12Section shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purpose 13of requiring the identification of the actual parties 14benefiting from any transaction with a governmental unit or 15agency involving the procurement of the ownership or use of 16real property thereby.17    For any entity that is wholly or partially owned by 18another entity, the names of the owners of the wholly or 19partially owning entity shall be disclosed under this Section, 20as well as the names of the owners of the wholly or partially 21owned entity. No such additional disclosure is required for 22contracts relating to the ownership or use of real property 23for highway purposes by the Department of Transportation. 24(Source: P.A. 91-361, eff. 7-29-99.) 25    Section 15. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by changing   SB2253 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1Sections 10-5-10, 10-5-15, and 20-5-5 as follows: 2    (735 ILCS 30/10-5-10)  (was 735 ILCS 5/7-102)3    Sec. 10-5-10. Parties. 4    (a) When the right (i) to take private property for public 5use, without the owner's consent, (ii) to construct or 6maintain any public road, railroad, plankroad, turnpike road, 7canal, or other public work or improvement, or (iii) to damage 8property not actually taken has been or is conferred by 9general law or special charter upon any corporate or municipal 10authority, public body, officer or agent, person, 11commissioner, or corporation and when (i) the compensation to 12be paid for or in respect of the property sought to be 13appropriated or damaged for the purposes mentioned cannot be 14agreed upon by the parties interested, (ii) the owner of the 15property is incapable of consenting, (iii) the owner's name or 16residence is unknown, or (iv) the owner is a nonresident of the 17State, (v) the owner may agree on the compensation to be paid 18but is unable to convey clear title or provide all required 19documents to convey title or comply with any State or federal 20legal requirements to complete an acquisition by agreement, or 21(vi) the owner may agree on the compensation to be paid but the 22acquiring agency does not receive needed documents to enable 23processing of or the issuance of a warrant for the payment of 24compensation to the property owner, then the party authorized 25to take or damage the property so required, or to construct,   SB2253 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1operate, and maintain any public road, railroad, plankroad, 2turnpike road, canal, or other public work or improvement, may 3apply to the circuit court of the county where the property or 4any part of the property is situated, by filing with the clerk 5a complaint. The complaint shall set forth, by reference, (i) 6the complainant's authority in the premises, (ii) the purpose 7for which the property is sought to be taken or damaged, (iii) 8a description of the property, and (iv) the names of all 9persons interested in the property as owners or otherwise, as 10appearing of record, if known, or if not known stating that 11fact; and shall pray the court to cause the compensation to be 12paid to the owner to be assessed.13    (b) If it appears that any person not in being, upon coming 14into being, is, or may become or may claim to be, entitled to 15any interest in the property sought to be appropriated or 16damaged, the court shall appoint some competent and 17disinterested person as guardian ad litem to appear for and 18represent that interest in the proceeding and to defend the 19proceeding on behalf of the person not in being. Any judgment 20entered in the proceeding shall be as effectual for all 21purposes as though the person was in being and was a party to 22the proceeding.23    (c) If the proceeding seeks to affect the property of 24persons under guardianship, the guardians shall be made 25parties defendant.26    (d) Any interested persons whose names are unknown may be   SB2253 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1made parties defendant by the same descriptions and in the 2same manner as provided in other civil cases.3    (e) When the property to be taken or damaged is a common 4element of property subject to a declaration of condominium 5ownership, pursuant to the Condominium Property Act, or of a 6common interest community, the complaint shall name the unit 7owners' association in lieu of naming the individual unit 8owners and lienholders on individual units. Unit owners, 9mortgagees, and other lienholders may intervene as parties 10defendant. For the purposes of this Section, "common interest 11community" has the same meaning as set forth in subsection (c) 12of Section 9-102 of the Code of Civil Procedure. "Unit owners' 13association" or "association" shall refer to both the 14definition contained in Section 2 of the Condominium Property 15Act and subsection (c) of Section 9-102 of the Code of Civil 16Procedure.17    (f) When the property is sought to be taken or damaged by 18the State for the purposes of establishing, operating, or 19maintaining any State house or State charitable or other 20institutions or improvements, the complaint shall be signed by 21the Governor, or the Governor's designee, or as otherwise 22provided by law.23    (g) No property, except property described in Section 3 of 24the Sports Stadium Act, property to be acquired in furtherance 25of actions under Article 11, Divisions 124, 126, 128, 130, 26135, 136, and 139, of the Illinois Municipal Code, property to   SB2253 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1be acquired in furtherance of actions under Section 3.1 of the 2Intergovernmental Cooperation Act, property to be acquired 3that is a water system or waterworks pursuant to the home rule 4powers of a unit of local government, property described as 5Site B in Section 2 of the Metropolitan Pier and Exposition 6Authority Act, and property that may be taken as provided in 7the Public-Private Agreements for the South Suburban Airport 8Act belonging to a railroad or other public utility subject to 9the jurisdiction of the Illinois Commerce Commission, may be 10taken or damaged, pursuant to the provisions of this Act, 11without the prior approval of the Illinois Commerce 12Commission. For property to be acquired by the Department of 13Transportation under Article 4, Division 5 or Article 8 of the 14Illinois Highway Code, the Commission shall issue its final 15order within 6 months after the date that the petition is filed 16unless the Commission extends the period for issuing a final 17order. The Commission may extend the 6-month period for an 18additional 3 months on its own motion, or on a petition filed 19with good cause by any party. The Commission may grant such 20extension upon finding of good cause. If the Commission 21extends the period for issuing a final order, then the 22schedule for the proceeding shall not be further extended 23beyond this 3-month period, and the Commission shall issue its 24final order within the extension period. The Commission shall 25also have the power to establish an expedited schedule for 26making its determination on a petition filed by the Department   SB2253 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1of Transportation in less than 6 months if it finds that the 2public interest requires the setting of such an expedited 3schedule.4    (h) Notwithstanding subsection (g), property belonging to 5a public utility that provides water or sewer service and that 6is subject to the jurisdiction of the Illinois Commerce 7Commission may not be taken or damaged by eminent domain 8without prior approval of the Illinois Commerce Commission, 9except for property to be acquired by a municipality with 10140,000 or more inhabitants or a regional water commission 11formed under Article 11, Division 135.5 of the Illinois 12Municipal Code or a municipality that is a member of such a 13regional water commission, only in furtherance of purposes 14authorized under Article 11, Division 135.5 of the Illinois 15Municipal Code, and limited solely to interests in real 16property and not improvements to or assets on the real 17property belonging to a public utility that provides water or 18sewer service and that is subject to the jurisdiction of the 19Illinois Commerce Commission. This subsection does not apply 20to any action commenced prior to the effective date of this 21amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly under this 22Section or Section 11-124-5 or 11-139-12 of the Illinois 23Municipal Code. 24(Source: P.A. 103-13, eff. 6-9-23.) 25    (735 ILCS 30/10-5-15)  (was 735 ILCS 5/7-102.1)  SB2253 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1    Sec. 10-5-15. State agency proceedings; information. 2    (a) This Section applies only to the State and its 3agencies, and only to matters arising after December 31, 1991.4    (b) Before any State agency initiates any proceeding under 5this Act, the agency must designate and provide for an 6appropriate person to respond to requests arising from the 7notifications required under this Section. The designated 8person may be an employee of the agency itself or an employee 9of any other appropriate State agency. The designated person 10shall respond to property owners' questions about the 11authority and procedures of the State agency in acquiring 12property by condemnation and about the property owner's 13general rights under those procedures. However, the designated 14person shall not provide property owners with specific legal 15advice or specific legal referrals.16    (c) At the time of first contact with a property owner, 17whether in person or by letter, the State agency shall advise 18the property owner, in writing, of the following: 19        (1) A description of the property that the agency 20    seeks to acquire. 21        (2) The name, address, and telephone number of the 22    State official designated under subsection (b) to answer 23    the property owner's questions. 24        (3) The identity of the State agency attempting to 25    acquire the property. 26        (4) The general purpose of the proposed acquisition.   SB2253 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1        (5) The type of facility to be constructed on the 2    property, if any.3    (d) At least 60 days before filing a petition with any 4court to initiate a proceeding under this Act, a State agency 5shall send a letter in any one of the following ways: 6        (I) by the United States Postal Service, certified 7    mail, return receipt requested;8        (II) by a designated private delivery service as 9    defined by the Internal Revenue Service that provides the 10    same function as certified mail with return receipts; or11        (III) the letter is personally served. , 12    A letter under this Section shall be sent to the owner of 13the property to be taken or, in the case of a corporation or 14other business organization, to the registered agent of the 15owner setting forth the following information , giving the 16property owner the following information: 17        (1) The amount of compensation for the taking of the 18    property proposed by the agency and the basis for 19    computing it. 20        (2) A statement that the agency continues to seek a 21    negotiated agreement with the property owner. 22        (3) A statement that, in the absence of a negotiated 23    agreement, it is the intention of the agency to initiate a 24    court proceeding under this Act.25    The State agency shall maintain a record of the letters 26sent in compliance with this Section for at least one year.  SB2253 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1    (e) Any duty imposed on a State agency by this Section may 2be assumed by the Office of the Attorney General, the Capital 3Development Board, or any other agency of State government 4that is assisting or acting on behalf of the State agency in 5the matter.6(Source: P.A. 94-1055, eff. 1-1-07.) 7    (735 ILCS 30/20-5-5)  (was 735 ILCS 5/7-103)8    Sec. 20-5-5. Quick-take. 9    (a) This Section applies only to proceedings under this 10Article that are authorized in this Article and in Article 25 11of this Act.12    (b) In a proceeding subject to this Section, the 13plaintiff, at any time after the complaint has been filed and 14before judgment is entered in the proceeding, may file a 15written motion requesting that, immediately or at some 16specified later date, the plaintiff either: (i) be vested with 17the fee simple title (or such lesser estate, interest, or 18easement, as may be required) to the real property, or a 19specified portion of that property, which is the subject of 20the proceeding, and be authorized to take possession of and 21use the property; or (ii) only be authorized to take 22possession of and to use the property, if possession and use, 23without the vesting of title, are sufficient to permit the 24plaintiff to proceed with the project until the final 25ascertainment of compensation. No land or interests in land   SB2253 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1now or hereafter owned, leased, controlled, or operated and 2used by, or necessary for the actual operation of, any common 3carrier engaged in interstate commerce, or any other public 4utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Illinois Commerce 5Commission, shall be taken or appropriated under this Section 6by the State of Illinois, the Illinois Toll Highway Authority, 7the sanitary district, the St. Louis Metropolitan Area Airport 8Authority, or the Board of Trustees of the University of 9Illinois without first securing the approval of the Illinois 10Commerce Commission. For property to be acquired by the 11Department of Transportation under Article 4, Division 5 or 12Article 8 of the Illinois Highway Code, the Commission shall 13issue its final order within 6 months after the date that the 14petition is filed unless the Commission extends the period for 15issuing a final order. The Commission may extend the 6-month 16period for an additional 3 months on its own motion, or on a 17petition filed with good cause by any party. The Commission 18may grant such extension upon finding of good cause. If the 19Commission extends the period for issuing a final order, then 20the schedule for the proceeding shall not be further extended 21beyond this 3-month period, and the Commission shall issue its 22final order within the extension period. The Commission shall 23also have the power to establish an expedited schedule for 24making its determination on a petition filed by the Department 25of Transportation in less than 6 months if it finds that the 26public interest requires the setting of such an expedited   SB2253 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1schedule. 2    Except as otherwise provided in this Article, the motion 3for taking shall state: (1) an accurate description of the 4property to which the motion relates and the estate or 5interest sought to be acquired in that property; (2) the 6formally adopted schedule or plan of operation for the 7execution of the plaintiff's project; (3) the situation of the 8property to which the motion relates, with respect to the 9schedule or plan; (4) the necessity for taking the property in 10the manner requested in the motion; and (5) if the property 11(except property described in Section 3 of the Sports Stadium 12Act or property described as Site B in Section 2 of the 13Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority Act) to be taken is 14owned, leased, controlled, or operated and used by, or 15necessary for the actual operation of, any interstate common 16carrier or other public utility subject to the jurisdiction of 17the Illinois Commerce Commission, a statement to the effect 18that the approval of the proposed taking has been secured from 19the Commission, and attaching to the motion a certified copy 20of the order of the Illinois Commerce Commission granting 21approval. If the schedule or plan of operation is not set forth 22fully in the motion, a copy of the schedule or plan shall be 23attached to the motion.24    The Department of Transportation shall report to the 25General Assembly no later than January 31 of each year the 26number of cases filed with the Illinois Commerce Commission   SB2253 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 12101 JRC 22200 b1under this Article during the previous year and the length of 2time taken, in months, to issue each final order during the 3previous calendar year. 4(Source: P.A. 94-1055, eff. 1-1-07.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.